Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.80.061

Legislative district chair—Election—Term—Removal.

Within 45 days after the statewide general election in even-numbered years, the county chair of each major political party shall call separate meetings of all elected precinct committee officers in each legislative district for the purpose of selecting a legislative district chair in such district. The district chair shall hold office until the next legislative district reorganizational meeting two years later, or until a successor is selected.

The legislative district chair may be removed only by the majority vote of the elected precinct committee officers in the chair's district.

[ 2024 c 232 s 4; 2004 c 271 s 150.]